Arkansas, session 2025, SB362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - YOUTH ORGANIZATION GRANTS. There is hereby
appropriated to the Department of Education, to be payable from the cash fund
deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for grants to youth organizations by the Department of Education -
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) YOUTH ORGANIZATION GRANTS $4,000,000

SECTION 2. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
*KMW038*
04-10-2025 13:36:01 KMW038

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 S4/10/25 SB362
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. YOUTH
ORGANIZATION GRANT REQUIREMENTS.
(a) A grant authorized by this act shall be awarded to a youth
organization that does not compel or require a person to adopt, affirm, or
profess an idea in violation of Title IV and Title VI of the Civil Rights Act
of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352 in accordance with any local or national
organization requirement that:
(1) Compels a person to adopt, affirm, or profess an idea in
violation of Title IV and Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L.
No. 88-352, as it existed on January 1, 2025, including that:
(A) People of one color, creed, race, ethnicity, sex, age,
marital status, familial status, disability status, religion, national
origin, or any other characteristic protected by federal or state law are
inherently superior or inferior to people of another color, creed, race,
ethnicity, sex, age, marital status, familial status, disability status,
religion, national origin, or any other characteristic protected by federal
or state law; or
(B) An individual should be discriminated against or
receive adverse treatment solely or partly because of the individual's color,
creed, race, ethnicity, sex, age, marital status, familial status, disability
status, religion, national origin, or any other characteristic protected by
federal or state law; or
(2) Requires a person or youth organization to adopt, affirm, or
profess an idea based on a diversity, equity, and inclusion initiative, which
includes:
(A) An office, division, department, administrator, or
person associated with a youth organization that has the purpose of:
(i) Influencing administrative, hiring, or
employment practices at a youth organization;
(ii) Promoting:
(a) Preferences based on race, color, sex,
ethnicity, or national origin;
(b) Differential treatment on the basis of
race, color, sex, ethnicity, or national origin; or
(c) Political or social activism to consider
race, color, sex, ethnicity, or national origin as factors in decision-
04-10-2025 13:36:01 KMW038

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 S4/10/25 SB362
making, except when required by federal or state law; or
(iii) Any promotion described under subdivision
(a)(2)(A)(ii) of this section that conflicts with state and federal
antidiscrimination laws;
(B) Any program, activity, applicant statement, or
training that promotes an activity described in subdivision (a)(2)(A)(ii) of
this section;
(C) The distribution of literature, materials, or other
information that promotes an activity described in subdivision (a)(2)(A)(ii)
of this section;
(D) The exposure to or distribution of materials through a
virtual platform that promote an activity described in subdivision
(a)(2)(A)(ii) of this section or that violate Title IV or Title VI of the
Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352; or
(E) Soliciting an individual, either in person or through
a virtual platform, to subscribe to or otherwise adhere to an activity
described in subdivision (a)(2)(A)(ii) of this section or that violates Title
IV or Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352.
(b) To be eligible for a grant authorized by this act, a youth
organization that is affiliated with a national organization shall submit to
the Department of Education a letter that notifies the Department that the
Youth Organization's intent is comply with this Act.
(c) A grant authorized by this act shall be provided to a youth
organization that aligns with the educational goals of the Governor and
General Assembly.
(d) A youth organization eligible for a grant under this act shall
promote the fundamental values of a healthy home environment and engage youth
to become role models in their homes, hometowns, schools, state, nation, and
the world.
(e) Funding shall be made available only to eligible entities for
comprehensive out-of-school time programs for school-aged children.
(f) To be eligible for a grant under this act, a youth organization
shall:
(1) Provide out-of-school time programs during the school year
to school-aged children;
(2) Provide regular activities designed for evidence-based
04-10-2025 13:36:01 KMW038

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 S4/10/25 SB362
academic enhancement that aligns with and supports state curriculum standards
and includes at least two (2) of the following five (5) activity areas:
(A) STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering and Math);
(B) Academic support;
(C) Goal setting and leadership activities;
(D) Career exposure and workforce readiness; and
(E) Community service opportunities.
(3) Provide activities under subdivision (f)(2) as part of a
comprehensive out-of-school program;
(4) Operate for a minimum of the following, which shall not
include designated school breaks:
(A) Twelve (12) hours each week during the school year;
and
(B) Four (4) days each week during the school year;
(5) Collect data on participants’ demographics, attendance, and
program participation, and compile statewide aggregated data;
(6) Implement rigorous safety standards, including without
limitation employee background checks and maintaining compliance with
mandated reporting laws; and
(7)(A) Be a qualified 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) organization that
has a record of fiscal accountability and has a Certificate of Good Standing
from the Secretary of State.
(g)Youth Organizations holding a charter of five years or less shall be
eligible for a matching grant share of seventy-five (75%) using the funds
appropriated in this Act once certification that a twenty-five (25%) local
investment, or match, including an in-kind match, is made for the program.
(h) If at any time it is determined by the department that a youth
organization has not followed requirements established by this section, the
youth organization shall not be eligible for any future grants and the
Department of Education shall report the violation to the Arkansas
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.
(i) The Department of Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education shall promulgate rules for the determination of eligible youth
organizations, the disbursement of funds, and the ongoing administration of
this program in accordance with the requirements of this section.
(j) The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July
04-10-2025 13:36:01 KMW038

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 S4/10/25 SB362
1, 2025 through June 30, 2026.

SECTION 3. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 4. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/K. Hammer


04-10-2025 13:36:01 KMW038